Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
General Provisions

17.010.
Department of public safety created — Appointment of commissioner — Divisions — Appointment of division heads. [Repealed.]

17.020.
Functions transferred to department. [Repealed.]

17.030.
Transfer of records, property, personnel, funds and functions to department. [Repealed.]

17.040.
Director of Division of Kentucky State Police — Functions. [Repealed.]

17.050.
Division of fire prevention — State fire marshal — Functions. [Repealed.]

17.060.
Division of driver licensing — Head — Functions. [Repealed.]

17.065.
Insurance advisory committee. [Repealed.]

17.070.
Department to assist and cooperate with other agencies — Governor may transfer other safety functions to department. [Repealed.]

17.080.
Justice Cabinet may make rules and direct proceedings. [Repealed.]